Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1570.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-710.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-710.04. State employees; diversity; equity; inclusion; hiring, training or promotion; prohibition; definition A. This state or an agency, board, commission or department of this state may not: 1. Use diversity, equity and inclusion programs for hiring, training or PROMOTION purposes. 2. require an employee to ENGAGE in a diversity, equity and inclusion program. 3. Require, as a condition of a contract, participation in a diversity, equity and inclusion program. B. The department shall monitor the HIRING practices of this state OR AN AGENCY, BOARD, COMMISSION OR DEPARTMENT OF THIS STATE to ensure that diversity, equity and inclusion programs are not used to hire, train or promote any employee. c. For the purposes of this section, "DIVERSITY, equity and inclusion program" means A program that requires an employee to participate in or attend a training, orientation, workshop, therapy or similar activity that focuses on justifying differential treatment or benefit on the basis of sex, color, gender, ethnicity, gender identity or sexual orientation. END_STATUTE